bg-BG: ключени елементи в комплекта блокиращи проводници: Телове за блокиране + Т-образни карфици; Телове за блокиране + инструкции/ръководство за модели; Телове за блокиране + ролетка; Телове за блокиране + неръждаеми карфици (без Т-образни); Телове за блокиране + тръба/калъф за съхранение; Само телове за блокиране; Само Т-образни карфици; Други
hr-HR: Set blokirne žice uključuje: Žice za blokiranje + T-igle; Žice za blokiranje + upute/vodič za uzorke; Žice za blokiranje + mjerna traka; Žice za blokiranje + nehrđajuće igle (ne u obliku slova T); Žice za blokiranje + tuba/kutija za pohranu; Samo žice za blokiranje; Samo T-igle; Ostalo
nl: Blokdraad set inbegrepen: Opspandraad + T-pins; Opspandraad + instructies/patroongids; Opspandraad + meetlint; Opspandraad + roestvrije pinnen (geen T-pins); Opspandraad + opbergkoker/-koffer; Alleen opspandraad; Alleen T-pins; Anders
sk-SK: Obsah sady blokovacích špendlíkov: Napínacie drôty a T-špendlíky; Napínacie drôty a návod/sprievodca vzormi; Napínacie drôty a meter; Napínacie drôty a nehrdzavejúce špendlíky (nie T-špendlíky); Napínacie drôty a úložný tubus/puzdro; Len napínacie drôty; Len T-špendlíky; Iné
da: Indhold i blokeringswiresættet: Opspændingswirer + T-nåle; Opspændingswirer + vejledning/mønsterguide; Opspændingswirer + målebånd; Opspændingswirer + rustfri knappenåle (ikke T-nåle); Opspændingswirer + opbevaringsrør/-æske; Kun opspændingswirer; Kun T-nåle; Andet
sl-SI: Komplet napenjalne žice vključuje: Žice za napenjanje + T-bucike; Žice za napenjanje + navodila/vodnik za vzorce; Žice za napenjanje + merilni trak; Žice za napenjanje + nerjaveče bucike (brez T-bucik); Žice za napenjanje + tuba/kovček za shranjevanje; Samo žice za napenjanje; Samo T-bucike; Drugo
ko: 블로킹 와이어 세트 구성품: 블로킹 와이어 + T핀; 블로킹 와이어 + 설명서/패턴 가이드; 블로킹 와이어 + 줄자; 블로킹 와이어 + 방청 핀(비 T핀); 블로킹 와이어 + 보관 튜브/케이스; 블로킹 와이어 전용; T핀 전용; 기타
pl: Zestaw drutów blokujących zawiera: Druty do blokowania + szpilki typu T; Druty do blokowania + instrukcja/przewodnik po wzorach; Druty do blokowania + miarka; Druty do blokowania + nierdzewne szpilki (inne niż T); Druty do blokowania + tuba/etui do przechowywania; Tylko druty do blokowania; Tylko szpilki typu T; Inne
it: Il set di fili di bloccaggio include: Fili per messa in forma + spilli a T; Fili per messa in forma + istruzioni/guida al modello; Fili per messa in forma + metro a nastro; Fili per messa in forma + spilli antiruggine (non a T); Fili per messa in forma + tubo/custodia; Solo fili per messa in forma; Solo spilli a T; Altro
ro-RO: Setul de fire pentru întindere include: Sârme de blocare + ace de tip T; Sârme de blocare + instrucțiuni/ghid de model; Sârme de blocare + bandă de măsurat; Sârme de blocare + ace inoxidabile (altele decât de tip T); Sârme de blocare + tub/cutie de depozitare; Doar sârme de blocare; Doar ace de tip T; Altele
fi: Pingotuslankasarja sisältää: Pingotuslangat ja T-neulat; Pingotuslangat ja ohjeet/malliopas; Pingotuslangat ja mittanauha; Pingotuslangat ja ruostumattomat neulat (ei T-neula); Pingotuslangat ja säilytysputki/-kotelo; Vain pingotuslangat; Vain T-neulat; Muu
nb: Sett med blokkeringstråd inkluderer: Blokkeringsvaiere + T-nåler; Blokkeringsvaiere + instruksjoner/mønsterguide; Blokkeringsvaiere + målebånd; Blokkeringsvaiere + rustfrie nåler (ikke T-nåler); Blokkeringsvaiere + oppbevaringsrør/-koffert; Kun blokkeringsvaiere; Kun T-nåler; Annet
th: สิ่งของที่รวมมาในชุดลวดลวดที่ใช้สำหรับบล็อกงาน: ลวดบล็อกกิ้ง + พินรูปตัว T; ลวดบล็อกกิ้ง + คู่มือ/ไกด์แพทเทิร์น; ลวดบล็อกกิ้ง + สายวัด; ลวดบล็อกกิ้ง + เข็มหมุดกันสนิม (ไม่ใช่พินรูปตัว T); ลวดบล็อกกิ้ง + หลอด/กล่องเก็บ; ลวดบล็อกกิ้งเท่านั้น; พินรูปตัว T เท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
en: Blocking wire set includes: Blocking wires + T-pins; Blocking wires + instructions/pattern guide; Blocking wires + measuring tape; Blocking wires + rustproof pins (non T-pin); Blocking wires + storage tube/case; Blocking wires only; T-pins only; Other
es: Elementos incluidos en el set de alambres de bloqueo: Alambres de bloqueo + alfileres en T; Alambres de bloqueo + instrucciones/guía de patrones; Alambres de bloqueo + cinta métrica; Alambres de bloqueo + alfileres inoxidables (no en forma de T); Alambres de bloqueo + tubo/estuche de almacenamiento; Solo alambres de bloqueo; Solo alfileres en T; Otro
tr: Bloklama teli set içeriği: Germe telleri + T-iğneler; Germe telleri + talimatlar/şablon kılavuzu; Germe telleri + mezura; Germe telleri + paslanmaz iğneler (T-iğne hariç); Germe telleri + saklama tüpü/kutusu; Sadece germe telleri; Sadece T-iğneler; Diğer
zh-CN: 格挡线套装包含组件: 定型针 + T 型针; 定型针 + 说明书/图解指南; 定型针 + 卷尺; 定型针 + 防锈大头针（非 T 型针）; 定型针 + 收纳筒/盒; 仅定型针; 仅 T 型针; 其他
ru: Комплект поставки блокирующей проволоки: Проволока для блокировки + T-образные булавки; Проволока для блокировки + инструкции/схемы; Проволока для блокировки + сантиметровая лента; Проволока для блокировки + нержавеющие булавки (не T-образные); Проволока для блокировки + тубус/чехол для хранения; Только проволока для блокировки; Только T-образные булавки; Другое
fr: Contenu du kit de fil de blocage: Fils de blocage + épingles en T; Fils de blocage + instructions/guide de motif; Fils de blocage + ruban à mesurer; Fils de blocage + épingles inoxydables (non en T); Fils de blocage + tube/étui de rangement; Fils de blocage uniquement; Épingles en T uniquement; Autre
de: Im Blockierdrahtset enthalten: Spann-Drähte + T-Nadeln; Spann-Drähte + Anleitung/Musteranleitung; Spann-Drähte + Maßband; Spann-Drähte + rostfreie Stecknadeln (keine T-Nadeln); Spann-Drähte + Aufbewahrungsrohr/-etui; Nur Spann-Drähte; Nur T-Nadeln; Sonstige
cs: Sada blokovacích drátů obsahuje: Vypínací dráty + T-špendlíky; Vypínací dráty + návod / průvodce vzory; Vypínací dráty + měřicí pásmo; Vypínací dráty + nerezové špendlíky (ne T-špendlíky); Vypínací dráty + úložný tubus / pouzdro; Pouze vypínací dráty; Pouze T-špendlíky; Jiné
sv: Setet med blockeringstrådar inkluderar: Spännvajrar + T-nålar; Spännvajrar + instruktioner/mönsterguide; Spännvajrar + måttband; Spännvajrar + rostfria nålar (ej T-nålar); Spännvajrar + förvaringsrör/-fodral; Endast spännvajrar; Endast T-nålar; Övrigt
pt-BR: O conjunto de fios de bloqueio/blocagem inclui: Fios de blocagem e alfinetes em T; Fios de blocagem e instruções/guia de modelo; Fios de blocagem e fita métrica; Fios de blocagem e alfinetes à prova de ferrugem (não T); Fios de blocagem e tubo/estojo de armazenamento; Apenas fios de blocagem; Apenas alfinetes em T; Outro
el: Το σετ σύρματος μπλοκαρίσματος περιλαμβάνει: Σύρματα τεντώματος + καρφίτσες T-pins; Σύρματα τεντώματος + οδηγίες/οδηγός πατρόν; Σύρματα τεντώματος + μεζούρα; Σύρματα τεντώματος + ανοξείδωτες καρφίτσες (εκτός T-pin); Σύρματα τεντώματος + σωλήνας/θήκη αποθήκευσης; Μόνο σύρματα τεντώματος; Μόνο T-pins; Άλλο
vi: Bộ dây định hình bao gồm: Dây định hình + ghim chữ T; Dây định hình + hướng dẫn/bản mẫu; Dây định hình + thước dây; Dây định hình + ghim chống gỉ (không phải ghim chữ T); Dây định hình + ống/hộp đựng; Chỉ có dây định hình; Chỉ có ghim chữ T; Khác
zh-TW: 包含定型鋼絲組: 定型線 + T 型針; 定型線 + 說明書/圖案指南; 定型線 + 捲尺; 定型線 + 防鏽針 (非 T 型針); 定型線 + 收納管/盒; 僅含定型線; 僅含 T 型針; 其他
lt-LT: Blokavimo vielų komplektą sudaro: Blokavimo vielos ir T formos smeigtukai; Blokavimo vielos ir instrukcijos / raštų vadovas; Blokavimo vielos ir matavimo juosta; Blokavimo vielos ir nerūdijantys smeigtukai (ne T formos); Blokavimo vielos ir laikymo tūbelė / dėklas; Tik blokavimo vielos; Tik T formos smeigtukai; Kita
ja: ブロッキングワイヤーセット付き: ブロッキングワイヤー + Tピン; ブロッキングワイヤー + 取扱説明書 / パターンガイド; ブロッキングワイヤー + 巻き尺; ブロッキングワイヤー + 防錆ピン (Tピン以外); ブロッキングワイヤー + 収納チューブ / ケース; ブロッキングワイヤーのみ; Tピンのみ; その他
pt-PT: O conjunto de fios de bloqueio inclui: Fios de bloqueio e alfinetes em T; Fios de bloqueio e instruções/guia de modelos; Fios de bloqueio e fita métrica; Fios de bloqueio e alfinetes à prova de ferrugem (não são alfinetes em T); Fios de bloqueio e tubo/estojo de armazenamento; Apenas fios de bloqueio; Apenas alfinetes em T; Outros
hu: Blokkolóhuzal-készlet tartalma: Blokkoló drótok + T-alakú gombostűk; Blokkoló drótok + útmutató / mintakönyv; Blokkoló drótok + mérőszalag; Blokkoló drótok + rozsdamentes gombostűk (nem T-alakú); Blokkoló drótok + tárolócső / tok; Csak blokkoló drótok; Csak T-alakú gombostűk; Egyéb